Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.690

Suspension of retirement allowance upon reemployment—Exceptions—Reinstatement.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 41.40.037, no retiree under the provisions of plan 2 shall be eligible to receive such retiree's monthly retirement allowance if he or she is employed in an eligible position as defined in RCW 41.40.010, 41.32.010, 41.37.010, or 41.35.010, or as a law enforcement officer or firefighter as defined in RCW 41.26.030, except that a retiree who ends his or her membership in the retirement system pursuant to RCW 41.40.023(3)(b) is not subject to this section if the retiree's only employment is as an elective official of a city or town.

(2) If a retiree's benefits have been suspended under this section, his or her benefits shall be reinstated when the retiree terminates the employment that caused his or her benefits to be suspended. Upon reinstatement, the retiree's benefits shall be actuarially recomputed pursuant to the rules adopted by the department.

(3) The department shall adopt rules implementing this section.

[ 2004 c 242 s 57; 1998 c 341 s 606; 1997 c 254 s 13; 1990 c 274 s 11; 1988 c 109 s 11; 1987 c 379 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 295 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Intent—Construction—Application—1997 c 254: See notes following RCW 41.26.490.

Application—Reservation—1991 c 35; 1990 c 274 ss 11, 12, 14, and 15: "Beginning on June 7, 1990, the 1990 amendments to RCW 41.40.690, 41.26.500, 41.32.800, and 2.10.155 regarding postretirement employment are available prospectively to all members of the retirement systems defined in RCW 2.10.040, 41.26.005(2), 41.32.005(2), and 41.40.005(2), regardless of the member's date of retirement. The legislature reserves the right to revoke or amend the 1990 amendments to RCW 41.40.690, 41.26.500, 41.32.800, and 2.10.155. The 1990 amendments to RCW 41.40.690, 41.26.500, 41.32.800, and 2.10.155 do not grant a contractual right to the members or retirees of the affected systems." [ 1991 c 35 s 11; 1990 c 274 s 19.]

Findings—Construction—1990 c 274: See notes following RCW 41.32.010.

Effective date—1988 c 109: See note following RCW 2.10.030.

Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 295: See notes following RCW 41.40.610.